dev/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="কর্মসূচি__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ক্ষত__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বাণিজ্য__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="কর্মসূচি"><i>কর্মসূচি</i><par n="কর্মসূচি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষত"><i>ক্ষত</i><par n="ক্ষত__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বাণিজ্য"><i>বাণিজ্য</i><par n="বাণিজ্য__n_mf"/></e>
